Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 5 Trial Courts
Effective September 1, 2022, the thirty-second judicial district consists of the counties of Hickman, Lewis, and Perry. The incumbent trial court judge elected pursuant to subdivision (21)(A)(ii) shall continue to serve the twenty-first judicial district until September 1, 2022, at which time the additional trial court created by subdivision (21)(A)(ii) shall be transferred to the thirty-second judicial district and presided over by a trial court judge to be elected by voters of the thirty-second judicial district at the August 2022 general election. Every eight (8) years thereafter, the qualified voters of the thirty-second judicial district shall elect a judge or chancellor for a full eight-year term;

Effective September 1, 2022, there is created the position of district attorney general for the thirty-second judicial district. At the regular August election in 2022, the qualified voters of the thirty-second judicial district shall elect a person to the position of district attorney general for a full eight-year term. The person elected to such position shall possess the same qualifications, powers, and duties and shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, benefits, emoluments, and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for other district attorneys general;

The district attorney general of the thirty-second judicial district is entitled to three (3) assistant district attorney general positions, one (1) administrative assistant position, two (2) secretary positions, one (1) criminal investigator position, and two (2) victim-witness coordinator positions;

On September 1, 2022, the office space and all state-owned furniture, equipment, supplies, books, and other such office property located in the Centerville or Hohenwald offices of the district attorney general of the twenty-first district and currently being used by the district attorney general of the twenty-first judicial district, or by one (1) of the district attorney general's assistants or investigators, shall be transferred for the use of the district attorney of the thirty-second judicial district. On and after such date, all such office space and other office property located in the Centerville and Hohenwald offices shall become the space for and property of the office of district attorney general for the thirty-second judicial district. Nothing in this subdivision (32)(B)(iii) prohibits the district attorney general from also establishing another office in the thirty-second judicial district; and

By September 1, 2022, all records, files, papers, and other official documents pertaining to any pending or completed case arising out of any of the counties comprising the thirty-second judicial district shall be transferred to and become the property of the office of district attorney general for the thirty-second judicial district.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 6; 1985, ch. 474, § 1; 1986, ch. 746, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 813, § 1; 1988, ch. 725, § 1; 1988, ch. 773, § 1; 1988, ch. 804, § 1; 1989, ch. 118, § 1; 1989, ch. 144, § 1; 1989, ch. 148, § 1; 1989, ch. 529, § 1; 1989, ch. 530, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 586, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 687, § 1; 1990, ch. 842, § 1; 1990, ch. 914, § 1; 1990, ch. 998, § 1; 1990, ch. 1013, § 1; 1990, ch. 1058, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 1064, § 1; 1991, ch. 287, § 1; 1991, ch. 435, § 1; 1991, ch. 474, § 1; 1992, ch. 593, § 1; 1992, ch. 961, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, § 15; 1993, ch. 330, § 1; 1993, ch. 506, § 3; 1994, ch. 540, § 1; 1994, ch. 804, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 937, §§ 2-31; 1994, ch. 949, § 1; Priv. Acts 1995, ch. 62, § 1; Acts 1995, ch. 398, § 1; 1997, ch. 120, § 1; 1997, ch. 450, § 1-8; 1998, ch. 771, §§ 1-25; 1999, ch. 179, § 1; 2001, ch. 361, § 1; 2003, ch. 216, § 1; 2005, ch. 31, §§ 1-23; 2015, ch. 437, § 1; 2018, ch. 974, §§ 1-3; 2020, ch. 530, §§ 1-3.

Code Commission Notes.

Article II, § 24 of the Constitution of Tennessee provides, in part, that:

Any law requiring the expenditure of state funds shall be null and void unless, during the session in which the act receives final passage, an appropriation is made for the estimated first year's funding.

The Tennessee code commission has been advised by the commissioner of finance and administration that the necessary first year's funding was not appropriated during the 1991 regular session for the following public acts which would have amended this section: Acts 1991, ch. 286, § 1; ch. 375, § 1; ch. 387, § 1; ch. 404, § 1; ch. 408, § 1; ch. 409, § 1; ch. 437, § 1; and ch. 478, § 1.

The code commission was directed by Acts 1991, ch. 509, § 54 to not codify acts which did not receive first year's funding. Accordingly, Acts 1991, ch. 286, § 1; ch. 375, § 1; ch. 387, § 1; ch. 404, § 1; ch. 408, § 1; ch. 409, § 1; ch. 437, § 1; and ch. 478, § 1, which would have amended this section, have not been codified. If the foregoing chapters had been codified, this section would have been amended as follows:

Chapter 286, § 1 would have substituted the following for the present text of (1)(B): “The district attorney general of the first judicial district shall be entitled to seven (7) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position.” This amendment would have taken effect July 1, 1991.

Chapter 375, § 1 would have added the following in (8)(B): “Effective July 1, 1991, the district attorney general of the eighth judicial district shall be entitled to an additional criminal investigator position. The district attorney general for such district shall appoint a suitable person to such position to serve at the pleasure of such district attorney general. The criminal investigator so appointed shall have the same power and authority as deputies of the county sheriff, and shall perform such duties and functions as the district attorney general may require. The criminal investigator shall be compensated as provided by law.”

Chapter 387, § 1 would have substituted the following for the present text of (3)(B): “The district attorney general of the third judicial district shall be entitled to seven (7) assistant district attorney general positions and three (3) criminal investigator positions. One (1) of the assistant district attorney general positions shall be a part-time position, and shall be filled only if funding for the position is available through the District Attorneys General Fiscal Affairs Act.” This amendment would have taken effect July 1, 1991.

Chapter 404, § 1 would have added the following in (13)(B): “Effective July 1, 1991, the district attorney general of the thirteenth judicial district shall be entitled to an additional assistant district attorney general position to be appointed and who shall have the same qualifications and duties as is provided in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-2-508.”

Chapter 408, § 1 would have added the following in (15)(B): “On July 1, 1991, the district attorney general of the fifteenth judicial district shall be entitled to one (1) additional assistant district attorney general position.”

Chapter 409, § 1 would have added the following as (31)(B)(x): “On July 1, 1991, the district attorney general of the thirty-first (31st) judicial district shall be entitled to an additional assistant district attorney general position.”

Chapter 437, § 1 would have added the following in (18)(B): “On July 1, 1991, the district attorney general of the eighteenth judicial district shall be entitled to an additional assistant district attorney general position.”

Chapter 478, § 1 would have added the following in (10)(B): “On July 1, 1991, the district attorney general of the 10th judicial district shall be entitled to one (1) additional criminal investigator.”

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3 provided that the additional criminal investigator for the tenth judicial district, provided for by the 1988 amendment to this section, shall have the same power and authority as deputies of the county sheriffs, shall perform such duties and functions as the district attorney general may require, and shall be compensated as provided for by the general law of this state.

Acts 1989, ch. 586, § 2 provided that authority and funding concerning a secretarial position created for the 31st judicial district shall be transferred to the district attorney general for the 4th judicial district, who shall select the person to fill such secretarial position.

Acts 1989, ch. 586, § 4 provided that for the purpose of qualifying and seeking election to the position of district attorney general for the thirty-first judicial district created by that act and for the purpose of transferring documents pertaining to such district, the amendment by that act took effect June 13, 1989. For all other purposes, § 4 provided that the amendment by ch. 586 take effect September 1, 1990.

Acts 1990, ch. 998, § 2 provided that the amendment by that act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the second sentence in subdivision (20)(B) unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Acts 1990, ch. 1013, § 2 provided that no state funds in excess of one hundred eighty-five thousand dollars ($185,000) shall be obligated or expended to implement the provisions of ch. 1013.

Acts 1990, ch. 1064, § 2 provided that no state funds in excess of one hundred eighty-five thousand dollars ($185,000) shall be obligated or expended to implement the provisions of ch. 1064.

Acts 1991, ch. 27 created five additional assistant district attorneys general, two criminal investigators and two secretaries to the staff of the district attorney general for the sixth judicial district, and provided for their appointment, compensation and duties.

Acts 1994, ch. 937, § 32 provided that the provisions of that act, which amended this section and enacted § 16-2-519, shall take effect only to the extent funding is provided specifically for its implementation in the General Appropriations Act. To the extent such funding is insufficient to fully implement the provisions of the act, the district attorneys general conference and the commissioner of finance and administration shall determine which provisions of the act shall be implemented. Section 32 further directed the code commission to codify only those provisions of the act deemed to be funded by the district attorneys general conference as provided above.

Acts 2003, ch. 216, § 2 provided that the provisions of the act shall have no effect, and no appointments shall be made pursuant to § 3 of the act, unless funds are appropriated in the 2003-2004 appropriations act to fund the estimated first year's costs of any positions, and associated costs, authorized by this act. Funding was provided by Acts 2003, ch. 356, § 12, item 7.

Acts 2003, ch. 216, § 3 provided that for the purpose of the governor appointing persons to serve as chancellor and judge of the three (3) judicial positions created by the amendment by the act, the act shall take effect June 2, 2003.

Acts 2020, ch. 530, § 5 provided: that the act, which amended this section, shall not be construed to limit, terminate, or otherwise affect the term or future terms of office of any circuit court clerk, criminal court clerk, or clerk and master, subject to the residence requirement found in § 18-1-102. All such incumbents shall continue in office until the expiration of their respective terms of office and shall be eligible for reelection or reappointment. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require, permit, or authorize the consolidation of the offices of clerk and master, circuit court clerk, or criminal court clerk or to place any clerk in a position of dominance over any other clerk.

Acts 2020, ch. 530, § 6 provided:

“(a) All process issued after September 1, 2022, shall be returnable at the times and places fixed by local court rules promulgated in accordance with this act. All bonds and undertakings executed after September 1, 2022, shall be governed by local court rules, insofar as to appearance dates and other conditions relating to time and place.

“(b) All cases, both civil and criminal except those that have previously been heard and taken under advisement, pending in any court in the twenty-first judicial district prior to September 1, 2022, shall as of that date be heard and determined in the appropriate court by the appropriate judge.

“(c) Notwithstanding Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 16, Chapter 2, to the contrary, nothing in this act shall be construed to repeal, amend, or affect in any manner any jurisdiction granted to any local court by any public or private law.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (19)(A)(vi).

The 2018 amendment added (16)(A)(iv), (19)(A)(vii), (21)(A)(ii) and (21)(A)(iii).

The 2020 amendment substituted “thirty-two (32)” for “thirty-one (31)” in the introductory language; substituted “Until September 1, 2022, the” for “The” in (21)(A)(i); in the last sentence of (21)(A)(ii), substituted “at which time the additional trial court shall be transferred to the newly created thirty-second judicial district and presided over by a trial court judge elected by voters of the thirty-second judicial district at the August 2022” for “or until the person’s successor is elected and qualified. At the August 2022”, and deleted “and every eight (8) years thereafter, the qualified voters of the thirty-first judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor for a full eight-year term;” following “general election”; at the end of the first sentence of (21)(A)(iii), added “, prior to being transferred to the thirty-second judicial district”; redesignated former (21)(B) as (21)(C); added (21)(B)(i) and (21)(B)(ii); and added (32).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 437, § 2. May 18, 2015.

Acts 2018, ch. 974, § 5. May 21, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 530, § 7. March 10, 2020.

Cross-References. Criminal investigators and assistant district attorneys general, compensation, title 8, ch. 7, part 2.

District attorneys general, title 8, ch. 7, part 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.10.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Flowers v. Dyer County: The Death of the Motion to Dismiss for Lack of Subject Matter Jurisdiction, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 409 (1993).

What Price is Justice? Adequate funding for judicial system needs to be top priority of upcoming General Assembly (W. Andy Hardin), 37 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 23 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, judges and district attorneys for certain judicial districts, OAG 87-163 (10/23/87).

County legislative bodies' responsibility to provide court facilities, OAG 99-049 (3/2/99).

Cited: Minor v. Williams, 640 F. Supp. 360, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15368 (M.D. Tenn. 1985); Flowers v. Dyer County, 830 S.W.2d 51, 1992 Tenn. LEXIS 491 (Tenn. 1992); Woods v. MTC Mgmt., 967 S.W.2d 800, 1998 Tenn. LEXIS 213 (Tenn. 1998); Cousin v. Sundquist, 145 F.3d 818, 1998 FED App. 171P, 1998 U.S. App. LEXIS 10796 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 1138, 119 S. Ct. 1026, 143 L. Ed. 2d 37, 1999 U.S. LEXIS 1020 (U.S. Feb. 22, 1999); Williams v. City of Milan, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 67 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 16, 2011).